North Carolina, session 2025, HB824.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. CREATE PARITY FOR COVERAGE UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN
APPLICABLE TO PHARMACIES AND PHARMACISTS

REQUIRE CERTAIN PHARMACY SERVICES TO BE COVERED UNDER A HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN
SECTION 1.1.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-241. Healthcare services provided by pharmacists.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Healthcare services. – Any of the following health or medical procedures or
services rendered by a healthcare provider:
a. Testing, assessment, and management of a health condition, illness,
injury, or disease. This includes testing, diagnosis, or treatment
rendered by a pharmacist acting within the pharmacist's scope of
practice.
b. Dispensing of drugs, medical devices, medical appliances, or medical
goods for the treatment of a health condition, illness, injury, or disease.
c. Administration of a vaccine or medication, including long-term
injectables such as buprenorphine.
(2) Pharmacist. – An individual licensed to practice pharmacy under Article 4A
of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or the relevant laws of another state.
(b) A health benefit plan offered by an insurer in this State shall cover healthcare services
provided by a pharmacist if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The service or procedure was performed within the pharmacist's licensed
lawful scope of practice.
*H824-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The health benefit plan would have covered the service if the service or
procedure had been performed by another healthcare provider.
(c) The participation of a pharmacy in a drug benefit provider network of a health benefit
plan shall not satisfy any requirement that insurers offering health benefit plans include
pharmacists in medical benefit provider networks."
SECTION 1.1.(b) This section is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to insurance
contracts issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

ACCEPT HEALTHCARE FACILITY CREDENTIALING FOR PHARMACISTS
EMPLOYED BY THE FACILITY
SECTION 1.2.(a) G.S. 58-3-230 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) Insurers that delegate credentialing agreements or requirements for pharmacists
licensed under Article 4A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or the relevant laws of another
state to a contracted healthcare facility shall accept the credentialing for all pharmacists employed
by, or contracted with, those healthcare facilities."
SECTION 1.2.(b) This section is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to insurance
contracts issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

PART II. ENHANCE COVERAGE OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS FOR OPIOID
DISORDER AND OPIOID OVERDOSE UNDER HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 58-3-220 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(k) Select Prescription Drugs. – Insurers offering a health benefit plan shall provide
coverage of all prescription drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration
for the treatment of opioid disorder and opioid overdose. If an insurer maintains one or more
closed formularies, then all prescription drugs requiring coverage under this section shall be
included on those formularies. The following shall apply to prescription drugs for which coverage
is required under this subsection:
(1) The prescription drug shall not be subject to prior authorization as a condition
of coverage.
(2) Pharmacies dispensing the prescription drug shall be reimbursed at the most
recent National Average Drug Acquisition Cost price plus a dispensing fee. If
the prescription drug dispensed is not available on the most recent National
Average Drug Acquisition Cost price list, then the most recent Wholesale
Acquisition Cost price plus a dispensing fee shall be used to reimburse
pharmacies for dispensing the prescription drug."
SECTION 2.2. This Part is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to insurance
contracts issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

PART III. CONFORM TO FEDERAL LAW AND MAKE OTHER TECHNICAL
CHANGES TO UPDATE THE GENERAL STATUTES THAT RELATE TO MENTAL
HEALTH COVERAGE UNDER HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS
SECTION 3.1.(a) Subsections (b), (c), (d), and (j) of G.S. 58-3-220 are repealed.
SECTION 3.1.(b) Subsection (h) of G.S. 58-3-220 is recodified as subsection (a1)
of G.S. 58-3-220.
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 58-3-220, as amended by Part II and Section 3.1 of this act,
reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-3-220. Mental illness health benefits coverage.
(a) Mental Health Equity Requirement. – Except as provided in subsection (b), an insurer
shall provide in each group health benefit plan benefits for All health benefit plans shall provide
coverage for the necessary care and treatment of mental illnesses health conditions that are no
less favorable than benefits for the necessary care and treatment of physical illness generally,
Page 2 House Bill 824-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
including application of the same limits. For purposes of this subsection, mental illnesses are as
diagnosed and defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, DSM-5, or
a subsequent edition published by the American Psychiatric Association, except those mental
disorders coded in the DSM-5 or subsequent edition as autism spectrum disorder (299.00),
substance-related disorders (291.0 through 292.2 and 303.0 through 305.9), those coded as sexual
dysfunctions not due to organic disease (302.70 through 302.79), and those coded as "V" codes.
For purposes of this subsection, "limits" includes deductibles, coinsurance factors, co-payments,
maximum out-of-pocket limits, annual and lifetime dollar limits, and any other dollar limits or
fees for covered services.health conditions.
(a1) Definitions. – As used The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as Health benefit plan. – As
defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
(2) "Insurer" has the same meaning as Insurer. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
(3) Medical necessity. – As defined in G.S. 58-50-61.
(4) "Mental illness" has the same meaning as in G.S. 122C-3(21), with a Mental
health condition. – A mental disorder defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual of Mental Disorders, DSM-5, or subsequent editions published by the
American Psychiatric Association, except this term does not include those
mental disorders coded in the DSM-5 or subsequent editions as autism
spectrum disorder (299.00), substance-related disorders (291.0 through 292.9
and 303.0 through 305.9), those coded as sexual dysfunctions not due to
organic disease (302.70 through 302.79), and those coded as "V" codes.
…
(g) Utilization Review. – Nothing in this section prevents an insurer from applying
utilization review criteria to determine medical necessity as defined in G.S. 58-50-61 as long as
it does so in accordance with all requirements for utilization review programs and medical
necessity determinations specified in that section, including the offering of an insurer appeal
process and, where applicable, health benefit plan external review as provided for in Part 4 of
Article 50 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.in accordance with G.S. 58-50-61.
…
(i) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a group health benefit plan that
covers both medical and surgical benefits and mental health benefits shall, with respect to the
mental health benefits, comply with all Federal Law Applies. – All applicable standards of
Subtitle B of Title V of Public Law 110-343, known as the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici
Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, and the applicable regulations, as
amended.amended, and other relevant federal law shall apply to health benefit plans.
…."
SECTION 3.3. The Revisor of Statutes shall replace the phrase "chemical
dependency" with the phrase "substance use disorder" in all of the following statutes:
(1) G.S. 58-51-16(a).
(2) G.S. 58-51-40(a).
(3) G.S. 58-51-55(b).
(4) G.S. 58-65-90(b).
(5) G.S. 58-67-75(b).
SECTION 3.4. All of the following are repealed:
(1) G.S. 58-51-50.
(2) Subdivision (a)(2) and subsection (c) of G.S. 58-51-55.
(3) G.S. 58-65-75.
(4) Subdivision (a)(2) and subsection (c) of G.S. 58-65-90.
(5) G.S. 58-67-70.
(6) Subdivision (a)(2) and subsection (c) of G.S. 58-67-75.
House Bill 824-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.5. G.S. 58-3-192(a)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) Autism spectrum disorder. – As defined by the most recent edition of the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) or the most
recent edition of the International Statistical Classification of Diseases and
Related Health Problems. Autism spectrum disorder is not considered a
mental illness health condition, as defined in G.S. 58-3-220, 58-51-55, or a
mental illness, as defined in G.S. 58-51-55, 58-65-90, or 58-67-75."
SECTION 3.6.(a) G.S. 58-56-26 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this Article to the contrary, all requirements relating
to the coverage of prescription drugs and pharmacy services under this Chapter that apply to
health benefit plans are applicable to a third-party administrator in the same way they are
applicable to an insurer."
SECTION 3.6.(b) Article 56A of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-56A-55. Health benefit plan requirements applicable.
All requirements relating to the coverage of prescription drugs and pharmacy services under
this Chapter that apply to health benefit plans are applicable to a pharmacy benefits manager in
the same way they are applicable to an insurer."
SECTION 3.7. This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to insurance
contracts issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 4 House Bill 824-First Edition